nursery/apertium-nld-fry/apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIYJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXZÂÊÉÔÛÚËÏabcdefghiyjklmnopqrstuvwxzâêéôûúëï</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Preadverb"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>

    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / feminine (Common)"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"     c="Common / neuter"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>

    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="enc"     c="Clitic form"/>
    <sdef n="par"     c="Partitive"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="attr"    c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="pred"    c="Predicative"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic (adjective)"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>

    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"    c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive -e"/>
    <sdef n="inf2"    c="Infinitive -n"/>

    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"   c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"   c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

   <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e><re>[’'‘]</re><p><l/><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>       <p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="en__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alhoewol't__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="by__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->

    <pardef n="nee__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="/de__det">
      <e><p><l>de</l><r>de<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>de<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="in__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oar__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/y__det">
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="di/zze__det">
      <e><p><l>zze</l><r>zze<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>zze<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zze</l><r>zze<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="myn__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="/ik__prn">
      <e><p><l>ik</l><r>ik<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>my</l><r>ik<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/o__prn">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/hy__prn">
      <e><p><l>hy</l><r>hy<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>him</l><r>hy<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>hy<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/sy__prn">
      <e><p><l>sy</l><r>sy<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>har</l><r>sy<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="it__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/wy__prn">
      <e><p><l>wy</l><r>wy<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ús</l><r>wy<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jimme__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/ja__prn">
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>ja<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ja<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>arren</l><r>ja<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wat__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="neat__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="ien__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="twa__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="taal__n_mf">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="of"><i>of</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mar"><i>mar</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="alhoewol't"><i>alhoewol't</i><par n="alhoewol't__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="efter"><i>efter</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fan"><i>fan</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fan" r="LR"><p><l>fân</l><r>fan</r></p><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="foar"><i>foar</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kwa"><i>kwa</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mei"><i>mei</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="neffens"><i>neffens</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nei"><i>nei</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="njonken"><i>njonken</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oan"><i>oan</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oant"><i>oant</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oant en mei"><i>oant<b/>en<b/>mei</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oer"><i>oer</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sûnder"><i>sûnder</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sûnt"><i>sûnt</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="troch"><i>troch</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tsjin"><i>tsjin</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tusken"><i>tusken</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="yn"><i>yn</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ôf"><i>ôf</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="út"><i>út</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ûnder"><i>ûnder</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ta"><i>ta</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="by__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i></i><par n="/de__det"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="in__det"/></e>
    <e lm="gjin"><i>gjin</i><par n="in__det"/></e>
    <e lm="oar"><i>oar</i><par n="oar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dy"><i>d</i><par n="d/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dizze"><i>di</i><par n="di/zze__det"/></e>
    <e lm="myn"><i>myn</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dyn"><i>dyn</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jo"><i>jo</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="syn"><i>syn</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="har"><i>har</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ús"><i>ús</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jimme"><i>jimme</i><par n="myn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ik"><i></i><par n="/ik__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>d</i><par n="d/o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hy"><i></i><par n="/hy__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sy"><i></i><par n="/sy__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="it"><i>it</i><par n="it__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="wy"><i>w</i><par n="/wy__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="jimme"><i>jimme</i><par n="jimme__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hja"><i>h</i><par n="h/ja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="wat"><i>wat</i><par n="wat__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="neat"><i>neat</i><par n="neat__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ien"><i>ien</i><par n="ien__num"/></e>
    <e lm="twa"><i>twa</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trije"><i>trije</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjouwer"><i>fjouwer</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fiif"><i>fiif</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seis"><i>seis</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sân"><i>sân</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="acht"><i>acht</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="njoggen"><i>njoggen</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tsien"><i>tsien</i><par n="twa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="taal"><i>taal</i><par n="taal__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="holle"><i>holle</i><par n="taal__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="tafel"><i>tafel</i><par n="taal__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="nee"><i>nee</i><par n="nee__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="wolkom by"><i>wolkom<b/>by</i><par n="nee__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
